Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 3. Nominations of Candidates by Political Parties.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, § 29.

§ 24.2-508.
Powers of political parties in general.

Each political party shall have the power to (i) make its own rules and regulations, (ii) call conventions to proclaim a platform, ratify a nomination, or for any other purpose, (iii) provide for the nomination of its candidates, including the nomination of its candidates for office in case of any vacancy, (iv) provide for the nomination and election of its state, county, city, and district committees, and (v) perform all other functions inherent in political party organizations.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-363, 24-364; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-172; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 119; 1973, c. 30; 1975, c. 515; 1978, c. 778; 1993, c. 641.

Law Review.

For a symposium, “The Law and Economics of Elections,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1533 (1999).

For a commentary, “The Theory of Political Competition,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1605 (1999).

For a commentary, “Pluralism With a Corporate Face: A Comment On Issacharoff and Ortiz,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1671 (1999).

For an article, “The Issue of Issue Advocacy: An Economic, Political, and Constitutional Analysis,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1761 (1999).

For a commentary, “Taking Issue With Issue Advocacy,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1793 (1999).

For a commentary, “On the Issue of Issue Advocacy,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1803 (1999).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Election Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 181 (2012).

For essay, “The Downfall of ‘Incumbent Protection’: Case Study and Implications,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 243 (2019).

§ 24.2-509.
(Effective until January 1, 2024) Party to determine method of nominating its candidates for office; exceptions.

The duly constituted authorities of the state political party shall have the right to determine the method by which a party nomination for a member of the United States Senate or for any statewide office shall be made. The duly constituted authorities of the political party for the district, county, city, or town in which any other office is to be filled shall have the right to determine the method by which a party nomination for that office shall be made.

Notwithstanding subsection A, the following provisions shall apply to the determination of the method of making party nominations. A party shall nominate its candidate for election for a General Assembly district where there is only one incumbent of that party for the district by the method designated by that incumbent, or absent any designation by him by the method of nomination determined by the party. A party shall nominate its candidates for election for a General Assembly district where there is more than one incumbent of that party for the district by a primary unless all the incumbents consent to a different method of nomination. A party, whose candidate at the immediately preceding election for a particular office other than the General Assembly (i) was nominated by a primary or filed for a primary but was not opposed and (ii) was elected at the general election, shall nominate a candidate for the next election for that office by a primary unless all incumbents of that party for that office consent to a different method.When, under any of the foregoing provisions, no incumbents offer as candidates for reelection to the same office, the method of nomination shall be determined by the political party.For the purposes of this subsection, any officeholder who offers for reelection to the same office shall be deemed an incumbent notwithstanding that the district which he represents differs in part from that for which he offers for election.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-348, 24-361, 24-363, 24-364; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-171, 24.1-172; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 119; 1973, c. 30; 1975, c. 515; 1978, c. 778; 1993, c. 641.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2024. For the version of this section effective January 1, 2024, see the following section, also numbered
§

24.2-509

.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

A candidate for city council

may be nominated by a political party. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Fenton L. Bland, Jr., Member, House of Delegates, 03-023 (6/13/03).

Law Review.

For note, “Morse v. Republican Party of Virginia: Political Costs or Benefits?”
see 6 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 397 (1998).

For essay, “The Downfall of ‘Incumbent Protection’: Case Study and Implications,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 243 (2019).

§ 24.2-509.
(Effective January 1, 2024) Party to determine method of nominating its candidates for office; exceptions.

The duly constituted authorities of the state political party shall have the right to determine the method by which a party nomination for a member of the United States Senate or for any statewide office shall be made. The duly constituted authorities of the political party for the district, county, city, or town in which any other office is to be filled shall have the right to determine the method by which a party nomination for that office shall be made. A method of nomination shall not be selected if such method will have the practical effect of excluding participation in the nominating process by qualified voters who are otherwise eligible to participate in the nominating process under that political party’s rules but are unable to attend meetings because they are (i) a member of a uniformed service, as defined in §

24.2-452

, on active duty; (ii) temporarily residing outside of the United States; (iii) a student attending a school or institution of higher education; (iv) a person with a disability; or (v) a person who has a communicable disease of public health threat as defined in §

32.1-48.06

or who may have come in contact with a person with such disease. However, such restriction shall not apply when selecting a candidate for a special election or nominating a candidate pursuant to §

24.2-539

, or in the event that no candidate files the required paperwork by the deadline prescribed in §

24.2-522

.

Notwithstanding subsection A, the following provisions shall apply to the determination of the method of making party nominations. A party shall nominate its candidate for election for a General Assembly district where there is only one incumbent of that party for the district by the method designated by that incumbent, or absent any designation by him by the method of nomination determined by the party. A party shall nominate its candidates for election for a General Assembly district where there is more than one incumbent of that party for the district by a primary unless all the incumbents consent to a different method of nomination. A party, whose candidate at the immediately preceding election for a particular office other than the General Assembly (i) was nominated by a primary or filed for a primary but was not opposed and (ii) was elected at the general election, shall nominate a candidate for the next election for that office by a primary unless all incumbents of that party for that office consent to a different method.When, under any of the foregoing provisions, no incumbents offer as candidates for reelection to the same office, the method of nomination shall be determined by the political party.For the purposes of this subsection, any officeholder who offers for reelection to the same office shall be deemed an incumbent notwithstanding that the district which he represents differs in part from that for which he offers for election.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-348, 24-361, 24-363, 24-364; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-171, 24.1-172; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 119; 1973, c. 30; 1975, c. 515; 1978, c. 778; 1993, c. 641; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 474.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2024. For the version of this section effective until January 1, 2024, see the preceding section, also numbered
§

24.2-509

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 474, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2024.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 474, effective January 1, 2024, added the last two sentences in subsection A.

§ 24.2-510.
Deadlines for parties to nominate by methods other than primary.

For any office, nominations by political parties by methods other than a primary shall be made and completed in the manner prescribed by law according to the following schedule:

For a general election in November, by 7:00 p.m. on the third Tuesday in June;

For a general election in May, by 7:00 p.m. on the first Tuesday in March;

For a special election held at the same time as a November general election, either (i) at least 81 days before the election or (ii) if the special election is held at the second November election after the vacancy occurred, by 7:00 p.m. on the third Tuesday in June before that November election;

For a special election held at the same time as a May general election, by 7:00 p.m. on the first Tuesday in March; or

For a special election held at a time other than a general election, (i) at least 60 days before the election or (ii) within five days of any writ of election or order calling a special election to be held less than 60 days after the issuance of the writ or order.In the case of all general elections a party shall nominate its candidate for any office by a nonprimary method only within the 47 days immediately preceding the primary date established for nominating candidates for the office in question. This limitation shall have no effect, however, on nominations for special elections or pursuant to §

24.2-539

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-130, 24-131, 24-134.1, 24-135, 24-363, 24-364; 1958, c. 605; 1960, c. 427; 1962, c. 536; 1964, cc. 540, 541; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-166, 24.1-172; 1971, Ex. Sess., cc. 119, 247; 1972, c. 620; 1973, c. 30; 1974, c. 428; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1978, c. 778; 1981, c. 425; 1983, c. 461; 1984, c. 480; 1991, c. 137; 1993, c. 641; 2010, cc. 449, 542, 645; 2011, c. 599; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 239.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 449 and 645 are identical, and in subdivision 5, substituted “45 days” for “thirty days” in clause (i) and substituted “45 days” for “thirty-five days” in clause (ii); substituted “47 days” for “thirty-two days” in the last paragraph; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2010 amendment by c. 542 substituted “81” for “seventy-four” in subdivision 3, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 599 twice substituted “60 days” for “45 days” in subdivision 5.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 239, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “third Tuesday” for “second Tuesday” in subdivisions 1 and 3.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Preliminary injunction. —

Committee of a political party was entitled — due to the COVID-19 health crisis — to a temporary injunction enjoining the Virginia Department of Elections and the Virginia State Board of Elections from enforcing statutory provisions against the committee so that the political party could then select its candidate for a Congressional district because the committee was likely to prevail on the merits and the harm of the party’s candidate not appearing on the general election ballot was irreparable. Seventh Cong. Dist. Republican Comm. v. Va. Dep't of Elections, 105 Va. Cir. 61, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 56 (Richmond Apr. 14, 2020).

§ 24.2-511.
Party chairman or official to certify candidates to State Board and general registrars; failure to certify.

The state, district, or other appropriate party chairman shall certify the name of any candidate who has been nominated by his party by a method other than a primary for any office to be elected by the qualified voters of (i) the Commonwealth at large, (ii) a congressional district or a General Assembly district, or (iii) political subdivisions jointly electing a shared constitutional officer, along with the date of the nomination of the candidate, to the State Board not later than five days after the last day for nominations to be made. The State Board shall notify the general registrars of the names of the candidates to appear on the ballot for such offices.

The party chairman of the district or political subdivision in which any other office is to be filled shall certify the name of any candidate for that office who has been nominated by his party by a method other than a primary to the State Board and to the general registrars of the cities and counties in which the name of the candidate will appear on the ballot not later than five days after the last day for nominations to be made. Should the party chairman fail to make such certification, the State Board shall declare that the candidate is the nominee of the particular party and direct that his name be treated as if certified by the party chairman.

In the case of a nomination for any office to be filled by a special election, the party chairman shall certify the name of any candidate (i) by the deadline to nominate the candidate or (ii) not later than five days after the deadline if it is a special election held at the second November election after the vacancy occurred.

No further notice of candidacy or petition shall be required of a candidate once the party chairman has certified his name to the State Board.

In no case shall the individual who is a candidate for an office be the person who certifies the name of the party candidate for that same office. In such case the party shall designate an alternate official to certify its candidate.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-134, 24-345.3; 1952, c. 509; 1954, c. 523; 1956, Ex. Sess., c. 1; 1958, c. 309; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 17; 1960, c. 383; 1962, c. 536; 1964, c. 539; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-169; 1972, c. 620; 1978, c. 778; 1982, c. 650; 1993, c. 641; 2006, c. 83; 2014, c. 473; 2016, cc. 18, 492.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 83 added subsection E.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 473 in subsection A inserted “along with the date of the nomination of the candidate.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “general registrars” for “secretaries of every electoral board”; and substituted “general registrars” for “secretary or secretaries of the electoral boards” in subsection B.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Election Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 121 (2006).